src/Alternations/Alternations.foma
define Front [е|и|ь|ѧ|ѣ|ь];
define Back [а|о|у|ъ|ы|ѫ];
define V [Front|Back];
define Labial [п|б|в|м];
define Hushing [ш|ж|ч|щ|{жд}];
define Palatal [{н҄}|{р҄}|{л҄}];
define Soft [Palatal|Hushing|ц|ѕ|j];
define RootBoundary ")" (")");
define OptRootBoundary (RootBoundary);
define IotationContext OptRootBoundary %+Iotation;
define Boundary (")") (")") ".";
define C [Labial|т|д|с|з|н|л|р|к|г|х|Soft];
define ClosedForm и -> {ьj}, ы -> {ъв} || _ ")" %+ClosedForm .o. %+ClosedForm -> 0 || _ ;
define ZeroGrade [ѣ|и] -> ь || _ C+ ")" %+ZeroGrade .o. %+ZeroGrade -> 0 || _ ;
define Consonantization [..] -> {.в} || и ")" (")") _ {.а.т.и};
define OptConsonantization [..] (->) {.в} || [и|ѣ|у] ")" _ "." V;
define IpfvAblaut о (->) а || _ C+ (")") {).и.а};
define GlideFormation {.и} -> %+Iotation || _ "." V;
define Iotation1 [..] -> {л҄} || Labial _ IotationContext;
define ClusterIotation с (".") [т|к] -> щ, з (".") [д|г] -> {жд}  || _ IotationContext;
define Iotation2 т -> щ, д -> {жд}, с -> ш, з -> ж, н -> {н҄}, р -> {р҄}, л -> {л҄},
[к|ц] -> ч, г -> ж, х -> ш || _ IotationContext;
define Iotation3 т -> щ, с -> ш || _ (".") (Labial) {л҄};
define GlideDeletion %+Iotation -> 0 || [Palatal|Hushing] (")") (")") _ "." V;
define Iotation Iotation1 .o. ClusterIotation .o. GlideDeletion .o. Iotation2 .o. Iotation3 .o. GlideDeletion;
define ClusterPalatalization {ск} -> щ || _ Boundary Front;
define SimplePalatalization к -> ч, г -> ж, х -> ш || _ Boundary Front;
define Palatalization ClusterPalatalization .o. SimplePalatalization;
define OptionalPalatalization ц (->) ч || _ Boundary Front;
define Lowering ѣ -> а || Hushing "." _ %+Class7 "." .o. %+Class7 -> 0 || _ ; # Only in the class 7 verbal suffix and not after a root boundary.
define GlideInsertion [..] -> i̯ || [V - и] _ ")" (")") "." [V - о], [.#.|V "."] "(" _ Front - и;
define IotationA {к҄} -> ч || _ ;
define ProgressivePal к -> ц || ь (")") (%.) _ (%.) а;
define FinalFronting ѣ -> и, ы -> и, ы -> ѧ || Soft Boundary _ .#.;
define GeneralFronting ъ -> ь, о -> е, ы -> и || Soft Boundary _ ;
define Fronting FinalFronting .o. GeneralFronting;
define Alternations ClosedForm .o. ZeroGrade .o. Consonantization .o.
OptConsonantization .o. IpfvAblaut .o.
GlideFormation .o. Iotation .o. Palatalization .o.
OptionalPalatalization .o. Lowering .o. GlideInsertion .o. IotationA .o.
ProgressivePal .o. Fronting;
